Massachusetts, session 194th, H3316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 79. The treasurer, in coordination with the Secretary of the Commonwealth, shall
provide a short summary each year to be published on the Secretary of the Commonwealth’s
website by March 15, which reports the total amount of income tax paid by Massachusetts
residents to the federal government in the prior year, together with the percent of those dollars
appropriated in the prior year’s congressional discretionary budget to housing, education,
healthcare, public transit, biomedical research, veterans services, food stamps and assistance,
environmental protection, and defense spending, including nuclear weapons. The summary shall
include this information in the form of a pie chart or bar graph, and using the budget numbers
reported by the federal Congressional Budget Office. The summary shall also include
of 2

information noting that Medicare and Social Security programs are financed as trust funds and
are not financed through income taxes.
The summary shall also include a report on the Commonwealth’s annual budget for the
prior fiscal year. The report shall communicate the percent of the budget allocated to housing,
education, healthcare, public transit, criminal justice, veterans services, food stamps and
assistance, environmental protection, and conservation and recreation. The report shall also
include the contribution of federal funds being returned to Massachusetts in those categories. The
report shall include this information in the form of a pie chart or bar graph.
The information required under this section may be acquired from any nonpartisan, third-
party organization that regularly compiles such data; provided further, there may be an
agreement with such an organization to produce the report.
of 2